Utah statutes.
58-57-3.   Board created -- Membership -- Duties.

(1)  There is created a five-member Respiratory Care Licensing Board consisting of the following persons:

(a)  one physician who is a member of either the American Society of Anesthesiologists, the American College of Chest Physicians, the American Thoracic Society, or the American Academy of Pediatrics;

(b)  three licensed respiratory care practitioners who have practiced respiratory care for a period of not less than three years immediately preceding their appointment to the board; and

(c)  one member from the general public.

(2)  The board shall be appointed and serve in accordance with Section 58-1-201.

(3)  The duties and responsibilities of the board shall be in accordance with Sections 58-1-202 and 58-1-203.

